California statutes. Education Code
(C) Not later than thirty (30) days after a rule is promulgated, any person may file a petition for judicial review of the rule; provided, that the filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent the rule from becoming effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has a substantial likelihood of success. The court shall give deference to the actions of the Interstate Commission consistent with applicable law and shall not find the rule to be unlawful if the rule represents a reasonable exercise of the Interstate Commission’s authority.

(D) If a majority of the legislatures of the compacting states rejects a Rule by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any
 compacting state.
Article XIII.Oversight, Enforcement, and Dispute Resolution
(A) Oversight

(1) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact, and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.

(2) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the
 subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission.

(3) The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the Interstate Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Interstate Commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

(B) Default, Technical Assistance, Suspension and Termination – If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the Interstate Commission shall:

(1) Provide written notice, to the defaulting state and other member states, of the nature of the default, the means of curing the default and any action taken by the Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its default.

(2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

(3) If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting state shall be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated from the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
 offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of the default.

(4) Suspension or termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Interstate Commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.

(5) The state which has been suspended or terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of suspension or termination including obligations, the performance of which extends beyond the effective date of suspension or termination.

(6) The Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found to be in default or which has been suspended or terminated from the compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon in writing between the Interstate Commission and the defaulting state.

(7) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Interstate Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(C) Dispute Resolution

(1) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member
 state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the compact and which may arise among member states and between member and nonmember states.

(2) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.

(D) Enforcement

(1) The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.

(2) The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the members, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the Interstate Commission, in the federal district where
 the Interstate Commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact or its promulgated rules and bylaws against a member state in default. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of a profession.
Article XIV.Financing of the Interstate Commission
(A) The Interstate Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

(B) The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

(C) The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
 prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

(D) The Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.
Article XV.Member, States, Effective
 Date and Amendment
(A) Any state is eligible to become a member state.

(B) The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than ten (10) of the states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2007. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

(C) The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment
 by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.
Article XVI.Withdrawal and Dissolution
(A) Withdrawal

(1) Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the compact into law.

(2) Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a
 statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until one (1) year after the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the Governor of each other member jurisdiction.

(3) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its receipt thereof.

(4) The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including obligations, the performance of which extend beyond
 the effective date of withdrawal.

(5) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall
 occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission.

(B) Dissolution of Compact

(1) This compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one (1) member state.

(2) Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.
Article XVII.Severability and Construction
(A) The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

(B) The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(C) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.
Article XVIII.Binding Effect of Compact and Other Laws
(A) Other Laws

(1) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with this compact.

(2) All member states’ laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(B) Binding Effect of the Compact

(1) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the member states.

(2) All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their
 terms.

(3) In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 142, Sec. 2.   (AB 1605)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49702.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Superintendent may accept nonstate funding to offset the cost of the annual assessment required by Section (B) of Article XIV of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children. These moneys shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (AB 343)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

49703.

The Superintendent may develop procedures for the training of employees of local educational agencies in the implementation of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children as part of the process developed pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 51250) of Chapter 2 of Part 28.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (AB 343)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 28. GENERAL INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAMS [51000. - 53303.]



  CHAPTER 1. Education Program [51000. - 51057.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [51000. - 51009.]

51000.

This chapter may be known as the George Miller, Jr., Education Act of 1968.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51002.

The Legislature hereby recognizes that, because of the common needs and interests of the citizens of this state and the nation, there is a need to establish a common state curriculum for the public schools, but that, because of economic, geographic, physical, political and social diversity, there is a need for the development of educational programs at the local level, with the guidance of competent and experienced educators and citizens. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to set broad minimum standards and guidelines for educational programs, and to encourage local districts to develop programs that will best fit the needs and interests of the pupils, pursuant to stated philosophy, goals, and objectives.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51003.

It is the intent of the Legislature that explicit, rigorous statewide academic standards be adopted for all pupils enrolled in public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

51004.

The Legislature hereby recognizes that it is the policy of the people of the State of California to provide an educational opportunity to the end that every pupil leaving school shall have the opportunity to be prepared to enter the world of work; that every pupil who graduates from any state-supported educational institution should have sufficient marketable skills for legitimate remunerative employment; that every qualified and eligible adult citizen shall be afforded an educational opportunity to become suitably employed in some remunerative field of employment; and that these opportunities are a right to be enjoyed without regard to economic status or the characteristics listed in Section 220.

The Legislature further recognizes that all pupils need to be provided with opportunities to explore and make career choices and to seek appropriate instruction and training to support those choices. The Legislature therefore finds that fairs as community resource and youth leadership activities are integral to assisting and guiding pupils in making choices and therefore encourage the further expansion of cooperative activities between schools, youth leadership activities, and community resources. Among community resources of particular significance in providing information on various career opportunities are vocational and occupational exhibits, demonstrations and activities conducted at fairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

51005.

In order to carry out the intent of Section 51004, the Department of Education shall annually encourage school districts to plan programs and activities which utilize the resources of fairs and youth leadership activities as an integral part of the vocational instructional program and career decisionmaking.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51006.

The Legislature finds that the increasing integration of computers and computer technology into our economy has profound implications for our society, and equally important implications for state educational policy.

The Legislature also finds that the methods of distribution of computer resources in the public schools will have a substantial effect upon the state’s ability to meet the economic, political, and social challenges of the new technological era. Without adequate and early exposure to a basic computer education and computer resources, many students may be placed at a significant disadvantage in their opportunities to secure success in academics and the job market in the future. As females compose 51 percent of the student population in the state’s public elementary and secondary schools, and ethnic minorities constitute over one-third of that population, it is imperative that California adopt a policy to ensure equitable access to technological education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51007.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California that all students enrolled in the state’s public elementary and secondary schools, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, gender expression, physical disability, geographic location, or socioeconomic background, shall have equitable access to educational programs designed to strengthen technological skills, including, but not limited to, computer education programs.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that state appropriations for educational programs designed to strengthen technological skills, including, but not limited to, computer education programs, shall have the goal of ensuring equitable
 access to those programs for all students.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not be construed to preclude funding of programs designed to serve certain categories of students as part of the state’s efforts to target areas of high need.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 719, Sec. 8.   (AB 887)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

51008.

The State Board of Education shall ensure that the state curriculum and framework, where appropriate, include instruction on Cesar Chavez and the history of the farm labor movement in the United States, and the role of immigrants, including Filipino Americans, in that movement, and that the state criteria for selecting textbooks include information to guide the selection of textbooks that contain sections that highlight the life and contributions of Cesar Chavez, the history of the farm labor movement in the United States, and the role of immigrants, including Filipino Americans, in that movement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 476, Sec. 2.   (AB 123)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

51009.

The month of May is hereby deemed to be Labor History Month throughout the public schools, and school districts are encouraged to commemorate this month with appropriate educational exercises that make pupils aware of the role the labor movement has played in shaping California and the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (AB 2269)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [51010. - 51021.]

51010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51011.

“Educational program” means the entire school-sponsored offering for pupils of a district, including in-class and out-of-class activities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51012.

“Common state curriculum” means the basic curriculum which is prescribed by the proper authority for all elementary schools, or all secondary schools, or all elementary and secondary schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51013.

“Curriculum” means the courses of study, courses, subjects, classes and organized group activities provided by a school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51014.

“Course of study” means the planned content of a series of classes, courses, subjects, studies, or related activities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51015.

“Course” means an instructional unit of an area or field of organized knowledge, usually provided on a semester, year, or prescribed length-of-time basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51016.

“Class” means an organized group of pupils within a school who are pursuing a particular course, subject or activity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51017.

“Governing board” means that board of education or governing board of any county, city and county, city, or district which has the duty to prescribe the course of study for the schools of the county, city and county, city, or district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51018.

“State board” means the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51019.

“Philosophy” means a composite statement of the relationship between the individual and society based upon beliefs, concepts, and attitudes from which the goals and objectives of the district are derived.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51020.

“Goal” means a statement of broad direction or intent which is general and timeless and is not concerned with a particular achievement within a specified time period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51021.

“Objective” means a devised accomplishment that can be verified within a given time and under specifiable conditions which, if attained, advances the system toward a corresponding goal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Role of Local Agency [51040. - 51041.]

51040.

The governing board of every school district shall prepare and shall keep on file for public inspection the courses of study prescribed for the schools under its jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51041.

The governing board of every school district shall evaluate its educational program, and shall make such revisions as it deems necessary. Any revised educational program shall conform to the requirements of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement of Courses of Study [51050. - 51057.]

51050.

The governing board of every school district shall enforce in its schools the courses of study and the use of textbooks and other instructional materials prescribed and adopted by the proper authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51053.

The course of study for preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 through 6, and grades 7 and 8 of those elementary districts maintaining grades 7 and 8, shall be prescribed and enforced by the governing board. The governing board of any school district may cooperate with the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools in the development of the courses of study required by this section.

The development of any course of study by a school district governing board which involves the cooperation of the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools is a proper charge against whatever funds the county superintendent of schools may have for this purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51054.

Except as provided in Section 51053, the course of study for grades 7 through 12 shall be prepared under the direction of the governing board having control thereof and shall be subject to approval as may be required by the state board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51055.

Courses for continuation high schools shall be prepared under the direction of the governing board having control thereof. Insofar as possible courses shall meet the high school requirements set forth in Sections 51220 and 51222.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51056.

A course of study for each adult school shall be prepared under the direction of the governing board of the district maintaining the adult school and shall be subject to approval of the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51057.

Upon request of the governing board of any school district, the State Board of Education may, for a number of years to be specified by the board, grant the district exemption from one or more of the course of study requirements set forth in this division. The exemption may be renewed. Such exemption may be granted only if the board deems that the request made is an essential part of a planned experimental curriculum project which the board determines will adequately fit the educational needs and interests of the pupils.

The request for exemption shall include all of the following elements:

(a) Rationale for the planned experimental curriculum project.

(b) Objectives of the planned experimental curriculum project.

(c) Plans for the administration and conduct of the planned experimental curriculum project, including the use of personnel, facilities, time, techniques, and activities.

(d) Plans for testing and evaluation of the planned experimental curriculum project.

(e) Plans for necessary revisions, if any, of the planned experimental curriculum project.

(f) Plans for reporting to the State Board of Education on the planned experimental curriculum project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Parental Involvement [51100. - 51141.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [51100. - 51102.]

51100.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is essential to our democratic form of government that parents and guardians of schoolage children attending public schools and other citizens participate in improving public education institutions. Specifically, involving parents and guardians of pupils in the education process is fundamental to a healthy system of public education.

(b) Research has shown conclusively that early and sustained family involvement at home and at school in the education of children results both in improved pupil achievement and in schools that are successful at educating all children, while enabling them to achieve high levels of performance.

(c) All participants in the education process benefit when schools genuinely welcome, encourage, and guide families into establishing equal partnerships with schools to support pupil learning.

(d) Family and school collaborative efforts are most effective when they involve parents and guardians in a variety of roles at all grade levels, from preschool through high school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 864, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

51101.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the parents and guardians of pupils enrolled in public schools have the right and should have the opportunity, as mutually supportive and respectful partners in the education of their children within the public schools, to be informed by the school, and to participate in the education of their children, as follows:

(1) Within a reasonable period of time following making the request, to observe the classroom or classrooms in which their child is enrolled or for the purpose of selecting the school in which their child will be enrolled in accordance with the requirements of any intradistrict or interdistrict pupil attendance policies or programs.

(2) (A) Within a reasonable time of their request, to meet with their child’s teacher or teachers and the principal of the school in which their child is enrolled.

(B) Within a reasonable time of their request, for parents of English learners, to meet with their child’s teacher or teachers to discuss their child’s progress toward reaching proficiency in English, the process by which their child may be reclassified as fully English proficient, any opportunities for pupils to develop biliteracy in English and one or more other languages, and to earn the State Seal of Biliteracy.

(3) To volunteer their time and resources for the improvement of school facilities and school programs under the supervision of district
 employees, including, but not limited to, providing assistance in the classroom with the approval, and under the direct supervision, of the teacher. Although volunteer parents may assist with instruction, primary instructional responsibility shall remain with the teacher.

(4) To be notified on a timely basis if their child is absent from school without permission.

(5) To receive the results of their child’s performance on standardized tests and statewide tests and information on the performance of the school that their child attends on standardized statewide tests, including the results of state assessments of English language proficiency.

(6) To request a particular school for their child, and to receive a
 response from the school district. This paragraph does not obligate the school district to grant the parent’s request.

(7) To have a school environment for their child that is safe and supportive of learning.

(8) To examine the curriculum materials of the class or classes in which their child is enrolled.

(9) To be informed through communication, including, but not limited to, parent-teacher conferences or report cards, of their child’s progress in school and of the appropriate school personnel whom they should contact if problems arise with their child, including, for the parent of a child who is an English learner, their child’s progress in developing English proficiency and being reclassified as fully English
 proficient.

(10) To have access to the school records of their child.

(11) To receive information concerning the academic performance standards, proficiencies, or skills their child is expected to accomplish, including, for pupils who are English learners, information on the proficiencies necessary to become reclassified as fully English proficient.

(12) To be informed in advance about school rules, including
 disciplinary rules and procedures in accordance with Section 48980, attendance policies, dress codes, and procedures for visiting the school.

(13) To receive information about any psychological testing the school does involving their child and to deny permission to give the test.

(14) To participate as a member of a parent advisory committee, schoolsite council, or site-based management leadership team, in accordance with any rules and regulations governing membership in these organizations. In order to facilitate parental participation, schoolsite councils are encouraged to schedule a biannual open forum for the purpose of informing parents about current school issues and activities and answering parents’ questions. The meetings should be scheduled on
 weekends, and prior notice should be provided to parents.

(15) To question anything in their child’s record that the parent feels is inaccurate or misleading or is an invasion of privacy and to receive a response from the school.

(16) To be notified, as early in the school year as practicable pursuant to Section 48070.5, if their child is identified as being at risk of retention and of their right to consult with school personnel responsible for a decision to promote or retain their child and to appeal a decision to retain or promote their child.

(b) In addition to the rights described in subdivision (a), parents and guardians of pupils, including those parents and guardians whose primary language is not English, shall
 have the opportunity to work together in a mutually supportive and respectful partnership with schools, and to help their children succeed in school. Each governing board of a school district shall develop jointly with parents and guardians, and shall adopt, a policy that outlines the manner in which parents or guardians of pupils, school staff, and pupils may share the responsibility for continuing the intellectual, physical, emotional, and social development and well-being of pupils at each schoolsite. The policy shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, the following:

(1) The means by which the school and parents or guardians of pupils may help pupils to achieve academic and other standards of the school.

(2) A description of the school’s responsibility to provide a
 high quality curriculum and instructional program in a supportive and effective learning environment that enables all pupils to meet the academic expectations of the school.

(3) The manner in which the parents and guardians of pupils may support the learning environment of their children, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Monitoring attendance of their children.

(B) Ensuring that homework is completed and turned in on a timely basis.

(C) Participation of the children in extracurricular activities.

(D) Monitoring and regulating the television viewed by their children.

(E) Working with their children at home in learning activities that extend learning in the classroom.

(F) Volunteering in their children’s classrooms, or for other activities at the school.

(G) Participating, as appropriate, in decisions relating to the education of their own child or the total school program.

(c) This section does not authorize a school to inform a parent or guardian, as provided in this section, or to permit participation by a parent or guardian in the education of a child, if it conflicts with a valid restraining order, protective order, or order for custody or visitation issued by a court of competent
 jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 12.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 16 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 619.)
-------------------------------------------

51101.1.

(a) A parent or guardian’s lack of English fluency does not preclude a parent or guardian from exercising the rights guaranteed under this chapter. A school district shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that all parents and guardians of pupils who speak a language other than English are properly notified in English and in their home language, pursuant to Section 48985, of the rights and opportunities available to them pursuant to this section.

(b) Parents and guardians of English learners are entitled to participate in the education of their children pursuant to Section 51101 and as follows:

(1) To receive, pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 51101, the results of their child’s performance on standardized tests, including the English language development test.

(2) To be given any required written notification, under any applicable law, in English and the pupil’s home language pursuant to Section 48985.

(3) To participate in school and district advisory bodies in accordance with federal and state laws and regulations.

(4) To support their children’s advancement toward literacy. School personnel shall encourage parents and guardians of English learners to support their child’s progress toward literacy both in English and, to the extent possible, in the child’s home language. School districts are encouraged to make available, to the extent possible, surplus or undistributed instructional materials to parents and guardians, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 60510, in order to facilitate parental involvement in their children’s education.

(5) To be informed, pursuant to Sections 33126 and 48985, about statewide and local academic standards, testing programs, accountability measures, and school improvement efforts.

(c) A school with a substantial number of pupils with a home language other than English is encouraged to establish parent centers with personnel who can communicate with the parents and guardians of these children to encourage understanding of and participation in the educational programs in which their children are enrolled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 47.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

51102.

Upon approval of the materials by the State Board of Education, the State Department of Education shall make materials available that describe a comprehensive partnership at a schoolsite that involves parents and guardians of pupils in the public schools of California in the education of their children in a variety of roles at all grade levels on or before December 31, 1999. The materials shall include information about the possible roles of each teacher, principal, parent or guardian, and other school personnel in fostering and participating in parent involvement activities and programs. The materials shall also include a statement that the right of parents and guardians to participate in parent activities and programs shall only apply to the extent that the participation does not conflict with a valid restraining order, protective order, or order for custody or visitation issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 864, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Teresa P. Hughes Family-School Partnership Award and Grant Program [51130. - 51133.]

51130.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Teresa P. Hughes Family-School Partnership Award and Grant Program and shall be administered by the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 734, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

51131.

As used in this article, “parent” means the natural, adoptive, or foster parent of a pupil, a surrogate parent, a family member acting on behalf of the parent, or any person having legal authority to make educational decisions on behalf of a pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 734, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

51133.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award nonmonetary Teresa P. Hughes Family-School Partnership Awards pursuant to this article to school districts and county offices of education for schools that operate outstanding family-school partnership programs.

(b) Nonmonetary awards made pursuant to this section shall be based upon the degree of parent participation and an assessment of any combination of the following types of parental participation:

(1) The membership or other participation in a functioning schoolsite council or other parent organization.

(2) The regular volunteer assistance provided in school activities both in the classroom and outside of the classroom.

(3) The participation in signed compacts or other educational plans with the teachers.

(4) The attendance at school functions that parents or families are invited to attend.

(5) The participation in parent training and education programs established or conducted by the school.

(6) The progress made over time toward increasing parental participation.

(7) The number of home visits by school personnel.

(8) The degree to which the outreach program emphasizes the importance of including parents of all pupils within its efforts to enhance parent participation.
